North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Article 2C. State Parks Act. [Repealed]

§ 113-44.7.

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.40 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(e), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113-44.8.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.42 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(e), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113-44.9.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.44 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(e), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113-44.10.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.46 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(e), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113-44.11.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.48 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(e), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113-44.12.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.50 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(e), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113-44.13.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.52 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(e), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113-44.14.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.54 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(e), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113-44.15.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.56 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(e), effective July 1, 2015.